Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.252

County hospital fund—Established—Purpose—Monthly report.

Every county which maintains a county hospital or infirmary shall establish a "county hospital fund" into which fund shall be deposited all unrestricted moneys received from any source for hospital or infirmary services including money received for services to recipients of public assistance and other persons without income and resources sufficient to secure such services. The county may maintain other funds for restricted moneys. Obligations incurred by the hospital shall be paid from such funds by the county treasurer in the same manner as general county obligations are paid, except that in counties where a contract has been executed in accordance with RCW 36.62.290, warrants may be issued by the hospital administrator for the hospital, if authorized by the county legislative authority and the county treasurer. The county treasurer shall furnish to the county legislative authority a monthly report of receipts and disbursements in the county hospital funds which report shall also show the balance of cash on hand.

[ 2016 c 95 s 7; 1984 c 26 s 20; 1971 ex.s. c 277 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 36 s 3; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.252. Prior: 1961 c 144 s 1; 1951 c 256 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—2016 c 95: "Local governments must be efficient and prudent stewards of our residents' tax resources. To best serve our communities, certain local government statutes must be amended to reflect technological and organizational change. It is the intent of the legislature to clarify current authorities so that local government can better serve their residents, and it is the intent of the legislature that the following sections allow local government to pursue modern methods of serving their residents while preserving the public's right to access public records, and judiciously using scarce county resources to achieve maximum benefit." [ 2016 c 95 s 1.]

Effective date—1967 ex.s. c 36: See note following RCW 36.62.290.